Vermont, session 2025-2026, H655.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. COMPOSITION OF DEPARTMENT; COMMISSIONER OF
LIQUOR AND LOTTERY; BOARD OF LIQUOR AND LOTTERY
* * *
(b)(1) The Board of Liquor and Lottery shall consist of five persons. Not
all members of the Board shall belong to the same political party.
(2)(A) With the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall
appoint the members of the Board for staggered three-year four-year terms.
* * *
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 230 is amended to read:
§ 230. SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR OFF-PREMISES
CONSUMPTION
* * *
(c) A licensee may sell alcoholic beverages pursuant to this section
between 10:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 3. 7 V.S.A. § 252 is amended to read:
§ 252. SPECIAL EVENT PERMITS
(a)(1) The Division of Liquor Control may issue a special event permit for
an event open to the public that has been approved by the local control
VT LEG #386353 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.655
2026 Page 3 of 5
commissioners if the application is submitted to the Division of Liquor Control
with the fee provided in section 204 of this title at least five days prior to the
date of the event.
* * *
Sec. 4. 7 V.S.A. § 275 is amended to read:
§ 275. SOLICITOR’S LICENSE
(a) The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant an individual a solicitor’s
license if he or she the individual does all of the following:
* * *
(3) Pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title to the Division of
Liquor Control by certified check made payable to the State of Vermont. The
certified check payment shall be returned to the applicant if the Board does not
grant him or her the individual a license under this section.
* * *
Sec. 5. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 156, Secs. 3 and 4 are amended to read:
* * * 2026 Sunset of Special Venue Serving Permits
for Retail Establishments * * *
Sec. 3. 7 V.S.A. § 254 is amended to read:
§ 254. SPECIAL VENUE SERVING PERMITS
VT LEG #386353 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.655
2026 Page 4 of 5
(a) The Division of Liquor Control may grant an art gallery, retail
establishment, public library, or museum a special venue serving permit if the
applicant has:
* * *
(e) An art gallery, retail establishment, public library, or museum may be
issued not more than 12 special venue serving permits in a calendar year.
(f) As used in this section, “retail establishment” does not include a
Vermont agency liquor store or a cannabis establishment as that term is
defined in section 861 of this title. [Deleted.]
Sec. 4. 7 V.S.A. § 2 is amended to read:
§ 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this title:
* * *
(38) “Special venue serving permit” means a permit granted by the
Division of Liquor Control permitting an art gallery, retail establishment,
public library, or museum to conduct an event at which malt or vinous
beverages, or both, are served by the glass to the public. As used in this
section, “art gallery” means a fixed establishment whose primary purpose is to
exhibit or offer for sale works of art; “public library” has the same meaning as
in 22 V.S.A. § 101; and “museum” has the same meaning as in 27 V.S.A.
§ 1151. As used in this section, “retail establishment” does not include a
VT LEG #386353 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.655
2026 Page 5 of 5
Vermont agency liquor store or a cannabis establishment as that term is
defined in section 861 of this title.
* * *
[Deleted.]
Sec. 6. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 156, Sec. 11 is amended to read:
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 5 shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 3 and 4 shall take effect on July 1, 2026. [Deleted.]
(c) All other sections shall take effect on July 1, 2024.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386353 v.1